Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 7. Enforcement.

Sec. 10.13.700.
Injunction and enforced compliance; appointment of receiver or conservator.

If, in the opinion of the department, a person has violated this chapter, or if there is reasonable cause to believe that a person is about to violate this chapter, the department may bring an action in superior court to enjoin the violation or to enforce compliance with this chapter. Upon a proper showing, a restraining order, preliminary or permanent injunction, or writ of mandamus shall be granted, and a receiver or a conservator may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant’s assets.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.710.
Cease and desist orders for unlicensed persons.

If the department finds that a person has violated or that there is reasonable cause to believe that the person is about to violate AS

10.13.120(b)

or

10.13.610(a)

, the department may order the person to cease and desist from the violation unless and until the person is issued a license under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.720.
Cease and desist orders for violations by licensees or subject persons.

After notice and a hearing, if the department determines that a licensee or a subject person of a licensee has violated or is violating, or that there is reasonable cause to believe that the licensee or subject person is about to violate this chapter, the department may order the licensee or subject person to cease and desist from the action.
The order may require the licensee or subject person to take affirmative action to correct a condition resulting from the action.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.730.
Cease and desist orders for unsafe and unsound acts.

After notice and a hearing, if the department determines that a licensee or subject person of a licensee has engaged in or that there is a reasonable cause to believe that the licensee or subject person is about to engage in an unsafe or unsound act with respect to the business of the licensee, the department may order the licensee or subject person to cease and desist from the action. The order may require the licensee or subject person to take affirmative action to correct a condition resulting from the action.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.740.
Other cease and desist orders.

If the department determines that a factor set out in AS

10.13.720

—

10.13.730

is true with respect to a licensee or subject person of a licensee and that the action or violation is likely to cause the insolvency or substantial dissipation of the assets or earnings of the licensee, is likely to seriously weaken the condition of the licensee, or is likely to otherwise seriously prejudice the interests of the licensee before the completion of proceedings conducted under AS

10.13.720

—

10.13.730

, the department may order the licensee or subject person to cease and desist from the action or violation. The order may require the licensee or subject person to take affirmative action to correct a condition resulting from the action or violation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.750.
Removal, prohibition, and suspension orders for certain acts.

The department may issue an order removing a subject person of a licensee from office with the licensee and prohibiting the subject person from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the licensee if the department determines after notice and a hearing that

the person has violated this chapter or another applicable law, has engaged in an unsafe or unsound act with respect to the business of the licensee, or has engaged in an act that constitutes a breach of the person’s fiduciary duty;

the act, violation, or breach of fiduciary duty has caused or is likely to cause substantial financial loss or other damage to the licensee, has seriously prejudiced or is likely to seriously prejudice the interest of the licensee, or the person has received financial gain by reason of the act, violation, or breach of fiduciary duty; and

the act, violation, or breach of fiduciary duty involves dishonesty on the part of the person, demonstrates the person’s gross negligence with respect to the business of the licensee, or demonstrates the person’s wilful disregard for the safety and soundness of the licensee.

The department may issue an order removing a subject person of the licensee from office with the licensee and prohibiting the subject person from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the licensee, except with the prior consent of the department if, after notice and a hearing, the department determines that, by engaging or participating in an act with respect to a financial or other business institution that resulted in substantial financial loss or other damage, the subject person of a licensee demonstrated

dishonesty or a wilful or continuing disregard for the safety and soundness of the financial or other business institution; and

unfitness to continue as a subject person of the licensee or to participate in conducting the business of the licensee.

The department may immediately issue an order suspending a subject person of a licensee from the person’s office, if any, with the licensee and prohibiting the subject person from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the licensee except with the consent of the department, if the department determines that

the factors in (a) or (b) of this section are true with respect to the person; and

an immediate order is necessary to protect the interests of the licensee or the public.

In this section, “office” means, when used with respect to a licensee, the position of director, officer, or employee of the licensee or of a subsidiary of the licensee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.760.
Removal, prohibition, and suspension orders in cases of indictment, binding over, or conviction.

If the department determines that a subject person of a licensee has been indicted by a grand jury or has been bound over for trial by a court for a crime involving dishonesty or breach of trust, and that the continuation of the person as a subject person of the licensee may threaten the interests of the licensee or may threaten to impair public confidence in the licensee, the department may issue an order suspending the person from the person’s office, if any, with the licensee and prohibiting the person from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the licensee until the person’s charge has been disposed of.

If the department determines that a subject person or former subject person of a licensee to whom an order was issued under (a) of this section, or another subject person of a licensee, has been convicted of a crime involving dishonesty or breach of trust, and that the continuation or resumption of the person as a subject person of the licensee may threaten the interests of the licensee, the department may issue an order suspending or removing the person from the person’s office, if any, with the licensee and prohibiting the person from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the licensee, except with the prior consent of the department.

The failure to convict a subject person who is charged with a crime involving dishonesty or breach of trust does not prevent the department from issuing an order to the person under another provision of this chapter.

In this section, “office” has the meaning given in AS

10.13.750

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.770.
Hearings on orders; rescission and modification.

Within 30 days after an order is issued under AS

10.13.710

,

10.13.740

,

10.13.750(c)

, or

10.13.760

, the licensee or subject person of a licensee to whom the order is directed may file with the department an application for a hearing on the order.

If the department fails to promptly notify the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) of the application and the office fails to begin a hearing within 15 business days after the application is filed or within a longer period to which the licensee or subject person consents, the order shall be considered rescinded.

After the hearing, the department shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order.

A person to whom an order is issued under this section may apply to the department to modify or rescind the order. The department may not modify or rescind the order unless the department determines that it is in the public interest to do so and that it is reasonable to believe that the person will comply with this chapter.

The right of a licensee or subject person to whom an order is issued under AS

10.13.710

,

10.13.740

,

10.13.750(c)

, or

10.13.760

to an interlocutory review of the order is not affected by the failure of the licensee or subject person to apply to the department for a hearing on the order issued under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992; am § 27 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Sec. 10.13.780.
Disclosure to shareholders.

If the department determines that the results of a department communication or order addressed to the licensee or to a subject person of the licensee should be disclosed to the licensee’s shareholders, the department may require the licensee to make the disclosure in the form and manner determined by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.790.
Meetings of directors and shareholders called by department.

If the department considers it expedient, the department may call a meeting of the board of directors or of the shareholders of a licensee.

The department shall send notification of the time, place, and purpose of the meeting not less than five days before the meeting to each director, if a directors’ meeting, or to each shareholder, if a shareholders’ meeting, either by personal service or by registered or certified mail sent to the person’s last known address as shown in the records of the department.

The licensee shall pay the notice and meeting expenses for a meeting of shareholders called under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.800.
Orders restricting additional financing assistance.

The department may issue an order directing a licensee to refrain from providing additional financing assistance to businesses if, in the opinion of the department, the order is necessary to protect the interests of the licensee or the public, and if, after notice and a hearing, the department determines that

the licensee or a controlling person, subsidiary, or affiliate of the licensee has violated this chapter or another applicable law;

the licensee is conducting the licensee’s business in an unsafe and unsound manner;

the licensee is in a condition that makes it unsafe or unsound for the licensee to transact business;

the licensee has ceased to transact business as a BIDCO;

the licensee is insolvent;

the licensee has suspended payment of the licensee’s obligations, has made an assignment for the benefit of the licensee’s creditors, or has admitted in writing the licensee’s inability to pay the licensee’s debts as the debts become due;

the licensee has applied for an adjudication of bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, or other relief under a bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, or moratorium law, an involuntary petition in bankruptcy against the person has not been dismissed in 90 days, or a person has applied for the relief under the law against a licensee and the relief has been granted or the licensee has by an affirmative act approved of or consented to the action; or

a fact or condition exists that would have been grounds for denying the licensee a license if the fact or condition had existed when the licensee applied for the license.

If the department determines that a factor in (a) of this section is true with respect to a licensee and that it is necessary for the protection of the interests of the licensee or the public that the department immediately prevent the licensee from providing additional financing assistance to businesses, the department may issue the order without a hearing.

If the department consents, a licensee that has been the subject of an order under (a) or (b) of this section may resume providing financing assistance to businesses under the conditions that the department prescribes.

A person to whom an order is issued under (a) or (b) of this section may apply to the department to modify or rescind the order. The department may not grant the application unless the department determines that it is in the interest of the public to do so and that it is reasonable to believe that the person will comply with this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.810.
Taking possession of licensee.

If the department finds that a factor in AS

10.13.800

is true with respect to a licensee and that it is necessary for the protection of the interests of the licensee or of the public, the department may take immediate possession of the property and business of the licensee and appoint a conservator for the licensee.

The department may appoint as conservator one of the employees of the department or another competent and disinterested person. The department shall be reimbursed out of the assets of the conservatorship for all money expended by the department in connection with the conservatorship. Upon the approval of the department, the expenses of the conservatorship paid for by the department shall be paid out of the assets of the licensee. Payment of the department expenses shall take priority over other payments from the assets and shall be fully paid before a final distribution is made.

Under the direction of the department, the conservator shall take possession of the books, records, and assets of the licensee and shall take other action that is necessary to conserve the assets of the licensee or to ensure payment of obligations of the licensee pending further disposition of the licensee’s business.

At an appropriate time, the department may terminate the conservatorship and permit the licensee to resume the transaction of the licensee’s business subject to the terms, conditions, restrictions, and limitations the department prescribes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992; am § 16 ch 14 SLA 2005)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 14, SLA 2005 (SB 52), amending (b) of this section, see 2005 Senate Journal 42 — 43.

Sec. 10.13.820.
Receivership.

The department may apply to the superior court for the appointment of a receiver for a licensee, if the department determines that the licensee should be liquidated because

the licensee is insolvent;

the licensee has suspended payment of the licensee’s obligations, has made an assignment for the benefit of the licensee’s creditors, or has admitted in writing the licensee’s inability to pay the licensee’s debts as the debts become due;

the licensee has applied for an adjudication of bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, or other relief under a bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, or moratorium law;

a person has applied for the relief described under (3) of this subsection against a licensee and the licensee has by an affirmative act approved of or consented to the action or the relief has been granted; or

the licensee is in a condition that makes it unsafe or unsound for the licensee to transact business.

If a receiver is appointed under (a) of this section, the receiver shall liquidate the property and business of the licensee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.830.
Civil penalty.

If after notice and a hearing the department finds that a person has violated this chapter, the department may order the person to pay to the department a civil penalty in the amount the department specifies. The civil penalty may not exceed $1,000 for each violation, or in the case of a continuing violation, $1,000 for each day the violation continues.

This section does not apply to an act committed or omitted in good faith in conformity with an order, regulation, declaratory ruling, or written interpretative opinion of the department, even if the order, regulation, declaratory ruling, or written interpretative opinion is later amended, rescinded, or repealed, or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid.

The provisions of (a) of this section are in addition to, and not alternative to, the other provisions of this chapter that authorize the department to issue orders or to take other action on account of a violation of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)